Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1171.
do enact as follows:SB1171,11Section 1. 100.303 of the statutes is created to read:SB1171,2,32100.303 Prohibiting certain pricing practices in the sale of consumer 3goods. (1) Definitions. In this section:SB1171,2,44(a) “Consumer” means an individual located in this state.SB1171,2,55(b) “Consumer data” means any of the following:SB1171,2,761. Any information related to a consumer that is purchased or otherwise 7acquired from a data broker, as defined in s. 757.07 (1) (a).SB1171,2,1182. Any information that is capable of being associated with a particular 9consumer through one or more identifiers or other information or circumstances 10and that relates to the consumer’s behavior, characteristics, or other personal 11attributes if the information is obtained in any of the following ways:SB1171,2,1212a. By means of online or in-person surveillance technology.SB1171,2,1413b. By using a fully automated system to extract and download data from social 14media platforms and other online sources.SB1171,2,1515c. By acquiring the information without the consumer’s consent.SB1171,2,17163. Any information related to a consumer that is a prohibited basis of 17discrimination against the consumer under s. 106.52 (3) (a) 1.SB1171,2,2018(c) “Consumer goods” means goods that are packaged by the product’s 19manufacturer or distributor with a universal product code and that are used or 20intended for use primarily for personal, family, or household purposes.SB1171,3,41(d) “Dynamic price gouging” means using any computational system or model, 2including artificial intelligence or machine learning, that processes consumer data 3to establish a customized price for a specific consumer at which a consumer good is 4offered or sold to that consumer.SB1171,3,75(e) “Retail seller” means a person that sells consumer goods, whether in-6person or online, to consumers primarily for personal, family, or household use and 7not for resale.SB1171,3,108(2) Dynamic price gouging prohibited. A retail seller may not offer or sell 9a consumer good at a price established in whole or in part through dynamic price 10gouging.SB1171,3,1311(3) Enforcement; penalty. If a retail seller violates sub. (2), the department 12or, after consulting with the department, the department of justice may do any of 13the following:SB1171,3,1514(a) Issue to the retail seller a warning notice specifying the action that the 15retail seller is required to take in order not to be in violation of sub. (2).SB1171,3,1816(b) Commence an action against the retail seller in the name of the state to 17recover a civil forfeiture of not more $10,000 or to temporarily or permanently 18restrain or enjoin the retail seller from violating sub. (2), or both.SB1171,219Section 2. Effective date.SB1171,3,2120(1) This act takes effect on the first day of the 4th month beginning after 21publication.SB1171,3,2222